src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/es.aff
SFX   e r  elas e r
SFX   e r  elo e r
SFX   e r  elos e r
SFX   entir i ntela entir
SFX   entir i ntelas entir
SFX   entir i ntelo entir
SFX   entir i ntelos entir
SFX   erer i rela erer
SFX   erer i relas erer
SFX   erer i relo erer
SFX   erer i relos erer
SFX   er la ner
SFX   er las ner
SFX   er lo ner
SFX   er los ner
SFX   ertir i rtela ertir
SFX   ertir i rtelas ertir
SFX   ertir i rtelo ertir
SFX   ertir i rtelos ertir
SFX   ervir  rvela ervir
SFX   ervir  rvelas ervir
SFX   ervir  rvelo ervir
SFX   ervir  rvelos ervir
SFX   r la ver
SFX   r las ver
SFX   r lo ver
SFX   r los ver
SFX   uir  yelas uir
SFX   uir  yela uir
SFX   uir  yelos uir
SFX   uir  yelo uir

SFX   Y 26
SFX   aber  beme aber
SFX   aber  benos aber
SFX   r dme r
SFX   r dnos r
SFX   aer  eme aer
SFX   aer  enos aer
SFX   ecir  ceme ecir
SFX   ecir  cenos ecir
SFX   edir  deme edir
SFX   edir  denos edir
SFX   egir  geme egir
SFX   egir  genos egir
SFX   eguir  gueme eguir
SFX   eguir  guenos eguir
SFX   erer i reme erer
SFX   erer i renos erer
SFX   erir i reme erir
SFX   erir i renos erir
SFX   er me ner
SFX   er nos ner
SFX   estir  steme estir
SFX   estir  stenos estir
SFX   r me ver
SFX   r nos ver
SFX   ucir  ceme ucir
SFX   ucir  cenos ucir

SFX   Y 14
SFX   aber  bele aber
SFX   aber  beles aber
SFX   r dle r
SFX   r dles r
SFX   aer  ele aer
SFX   aer  eles aer
SFX   cer zle cer
SFX   cer zles cer
SFX   edir  dele edir
SFX   edir  deles edir
SFX   er le ner
SFX   er les ner
SFX   r le ver
SFX   r les ver

SFX   Y 60
SFX   aer  emela aer
SFX   aer  emelas aer
SFX   aer  emelo aer
SFX   aer  emelos aer
SFX   aer  enosla aer
SFX   aer  enoslas aer
SFX   aer  enoslo aer
SFX   aer  enoslos aer
SFX   aer  esela aer
SFX   aer  eselas aer
SFX   aer  eselo aer
SFX   aer  eselos aer
SFX   er  dmela er
SFX   er  dmelas er
SFX   er  dmelo er
SFX   er  dmelos er
SFX   er  dnosla er
SFX   er  dnoslas er
SFX   er  dnoslo er
SFX   er  dnoslos er
SFX   er  dsela er
SFX   er  dselas er
SFX   er  dselo er
SFX   er  dselos er
SFX   edir  demela edir
SFX   edir  demelas edir
SFX   edir  demelo edir
SFX   edir  demelos edir
SFX   edir  denosla edir
SFX   edir  denoslas edir
SFX   edir  denoslo edir
SFX   edir  denoslos edir
SFX   edir  desela edir
SFX   edir  deselas edir
SFX   edir  deselo edir
SFX   edir  deselos edir
SFX   ir  dmela ir
SFX   ir  dmelas ir
SFX   ir  dmelo ir
SFX   ir  dmelos ir
SFX   ir  dnosla ir
SFX   ir  dnoslas ir
SFX   ir  dnoslo ir
SFX   ir  dnoslos ir
SFX   ir  dsela ir
SFX   ir  dselas ir
SFX   ir  dselo ir
SFX   ir  dselos ir
SFX   oner  nmela oner
SFX   oner  nmelas oner
SFX   oner  nmelo oner
SFX   oner  nmelos oner
SFX   oner  nnosla oner
SFX   oner  nnoslas oner
SFX   oner  nnoslo oner
SFX   oner  nnoslos oner
SFX   oner  nsela oner
SFX   oner  nselas oner
SFX   oner  nselo oner
SFX   oner  nselos oner

SFX   Y 664
SFX   acar  quela acar
SFX   acar  quelas acar
SFX   acar  quelo acar
SFX   acar  quelos acar
SFX   acar  quenla acar
SFX   acar  quenlas acar
SFX   acar  quenlo acar
SFX   acar  quenlos acar
SFX   achar  chela achar
SFX   achar  chelas achar
SFX   achar  chelo achar
SFX   achar  chelos achar
SFX   achar  chenla achar
SFX   achar  chenlas achar
SFX   achar  chenlo achar
SFX   achar  chenlos achar
SFX   adar  dela adar
SFX   adar  delas adar
SFX   adar  delo adar
SFX   adar  delos adar
SFX   adar  denla adar
SFX   adar  denlas adar
SFX   adar  denlo adar
SFX   adar  denlos adar
SFX   agar  guela agar
SFX   agar  guelas agar
SFX   agar  guelo agar
SFX   agar  guelos agar
SFX   agar  guenla agar
SFX   agar  guenlas agar
SFX   agar  guenlo agar
SFX   agar  guenlos agar
SFX   ajar  jela ajar
SFX   ajar  jelas ajar
SFX   ajar  jelo ajar
SFX   ajar  jelos ajar
SFX   ajar  jenla ajar
SFX   ajar  jenlas ajar
SFX   ajar  jenlo ajar
SFX   ajar  jenlos ajar
SFX   ambiar  mbiela ambiar
SFX   ambiar  mbielas ambiar
SFX   ambiar  mbielo ambiar
SFX   ambiar  mbielos ambiar
SFX   ambiar  mbienla ambiar
SFX   ambiar  mbienlas ambiar
SFX   ambiar  mbienlo ambiar
SFX   ambiar  mbienlos ambiar
SFX   ancar  nquela ancar
SFX   ancar  nquelas ancar
SFX   ancar  nquelo ancar
SFX   ancar  nquelos ancar
SFX   ancar  nquenla ancar
SFX   ancar  nquenlas ancar
SFX   ancar  nquenlo ancar
SFX   ancar  nquenlos ancar
SFX   anchar  nchela anchar
SFX   anchar  nchelas anchar
SFX   anchar  nchelo anchar
SFX   anchar  nchelos anchar
SFX   anchar  nchenla anchar
SFX   anchar  nchenlas anchar
SFX   anchar  nchenlo anchar
SFX   anchar  nchenlos anchar
SFX   andar  ndela andar
SFX   andar  ndelas andar
SFX   andar  ndelo andar
SFX   andar  ndelos andar
SFX   andar  ndenla andar
SFX   andar  ndenlas andar
SFX   andar  ndenlo andar
SFX   andar  ndenlos andar
SFX   andir  ndala andir
SFX   andir  ndalas andir
SFX   andir  ndalo andir
SFX   andir  ndalos andir
SFX   andir  ndanla andir
SFX   andir  ndanlas andir
SFX   andir  ndanlo andir
SFX   andir  ndanlos andir
SFX   a ar   ela a ar
SFX   a ar   elas a ar
SFX   a ar   elo a ar
SFX   a ar   elos a ar
SFX   a ar   enla a ar
SFX   a ar   enlas a ar
SFX   a ar   enlo a ar
SFX   a ar   enlos a ar
SFX   apar  pela apar
SFX   apar  pelas apar
SFX   apar  pelo apar
SFX   apar  pelos apar
SFX   apar  penla apar
SFX   apar  penlas apar
SFX   apar  penlo apar
SFX   apar  penlos apar
SFX   arar  rela arar
SFX   arar  relas arar
SFX   arar  relo arar
SFX   arar  relos arar
SFX   arar  renla arar
SFX   arar  renlas arar
SFX   arar  renlo arar
SFX   arar  renlos arar
SFX   ardar  rdela ardar
SFX   ardar  rdelas ardar
SFX   ardar  rdelo ardar
SFX   ardar  rdelos ardar
SFX   ardar  rdenla ardar
SFX   ardar  rdenlas ardar
SFX   ardar  rdenlo ardar
SFX   ardar  rdenlos ardar
SFX   arrar  rrela arrar
SFX   arrar  rrelas arrar
SFX   arrar  rrelo arrar
SFX   arrar  rrelos arrar
SFX   arrar  rrenla arrar
SFX   arrar  rrenlas arrar
SFX   arrar  rrenlo arrar
SFX   arrar  rrenlos arrar
SFX   artar  rtela artar
SFX   artar  rtelas artar
SFX   artar  rtelo artar
SFX   artar  rtelos artar
SFX   artar  rtenla artar
SFX   artar  rtenlas artar
SFX   artar  rtenlo artar
SFX   artar  rtenlos artar
SFX   artir  rtala artir
SFX   artir  rtalas artir
SFX   artir  rtalo artir
SFX   artir  rtalos artir
SFX   artir  rtanla artir
SFX   artir  rtanlas artir
SFX   artir  rtanlo artir
SFX   artir  rtanlos artir
SFX   asar  sela asar
SFX   asar  selas asar
SFX   asar  selo asar
SFX   asar  selos asar
SFX   asar  senla asar
SFX   asar  senlas asar
SFX   asar  senlo asar
SFX   asar  senlos asar
SFX   astrar  strela astrar
SFX   astrar  strelas astrar
SFX   astrar  strelo astrar
SFX   astrar  strelos astrar
SFX   astrar  strenla astrar
SFX   astrar  strenlas astrar
SFX   astrar  strenlo astrar
SFX   astrar  strenlos astrar
SFX   atar  tela atar
SFX   atar  telas atar
SFX   atar  telo atar
SFX   atar  telos atar
SFX   atar  tenla atar
SFX   atar  tenlas atar
SFX   atar  tenlo atar
SFX   atar  tenlos atar
SFX   atir  tala atir
SFX   atir  talas atir
SFX   atir  talo atir
SFX   atir  talos atir
SFX   atir  tanla atir
SFX   atir  tanlas atir
SFX   atir  tanlo atir
SFX   atir  tanlos atir
SFX   azar  cela azar
SFX   azar  celas azar
SFX   azar  celo azar
SFX   azar  celos azar
SFX   azar  cenla azar
SFX   azar  cenlas azar
SFX   azar  cenlo azar
SFX   azar  cenlos azar
SFX   ear  ela ear
SFX   ear  elas ear
SFX   ear  elo ear
SFX   ear  elos ear
SFX   ear  enla ear
SFX   ear  enlas ear
SFX   ear  enlo ear
SFX   ear  enlos ear
SFX   ecar  quela ecar
SFX   ecar  quelas ecar
SFX   ecar  quelo ecar
SFX   ecar  quelos ecar
SFX   ecar  quenla ecar
SFX   ecar  quenlas ecar
SFX   ecar  quenlo ecar
SFX   ecar  quenlos ecar
SFX   echar  chela echar
SFX   echar  chelas echar
SFX   echar  chelo echar
SFX   echar  chelos echar
SFX   echar  chenla echar
SFX   echar  chenlas echar
SFX   echar  chenlo echar
SFX   echar  chenlos echar
SFX   ectar  ctela ectar
SFX   ectar  ctelas ectar
SFX   ectar  ctelo ectar
SFX   ectar  ctelos ectar
SFX   ectar  ctenla ectar
SFX   ectar  ctenlas ectar
