src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/es.dic
abundad/rt
al/ap
atomicen/a
atomizo/aG
baja/pa
baje/GaSp
balaustrada/a
balean/a
bale is/a
balicen/a
bal /ai
banderice/aS
ba a/ap
ba ar /a
ba  /ap
barbechar/RDaE
barload/a
barquero/aGS
barrote/aiS
bastarde/SGa
bastes/ahi
bastion /a
batane/aG
bat a/pga
batojar/RaDE
bemoles/a
berro/a
bina/ap
bin /ap
biselo/a
bito/ap
boba/ia
bocina/a
bocin /a
bof /a
bogu /a
bollones/a
bono/GaS
bordarme/ah
bordones/a
botones/ha
boyo/a
breces/a
brezar/aRED
br os/a
brom /ia
broquelar/RiDaE
bruma/a
brumo/a
buce/aS
burujo/ipa
cabalan/ah
caballera/a
cabe/paiS
cachan/ia
cach /ai
calabroten/a
callanto/a
campa/hag
cantaleaban/a
cantara/iagh
cantonan/ha
ca onea/a
capullo/ah
carrete/aGS
cat /ap
cautelan/an
cebos/a
cendran/ai
cepillad/a
cernada/Sia
chaflan /a
charolar/aRDE
china/pai
chucho/a
ciguata/a
clam /ogpa
cloqu /ia
cocead/a
codiciad/a
colan/ahi
colo/hai
comet /a
conchabar/aRhED
congojad/ha
cop /a
coqu /ha
cordele/aSGi
corrales/ia
cort /jap
corv /iap
costumbr /a
cotej /a
cribo/hua
crisolo/a
cuantiad/a
cuartel /a
cuchilla/a
culada/Spha
cune/GSia
curruca/Sa
decentes/ka
densar/fa
diado/aS
dinerada/Sa
doctrinar/RakDE
dorm a/aS
dormit /a
dular/Sa
durm is/a
felpen/a
fijos/na
fil /iah
fino/fnjgptGa
fistulad/a
flor /auhi
foll is/a
forran/a
fosase/a
frenillad/a
fricada/a
fuf /a
fumase/a
gamita/a
gangreno/a
garb /ia
garrocho/a
gazapa/a
goles/ia
grada/gha
gram /oah
griet /a
grupa/aS
guardare/paGS
guizgad/ai
heleo/pa
hincar /ha
hitar/RaD
horca/NaS
huchean/a
huev /a
jedrea/aS
jornalo/a
juntad/fahpj
justician/a
ladr /a
lamp /a
lanza/pa
largan/a
le is/apf
legar/gRpaD E
lelo/aSG
lezna/ag
ligera/aS
lindad/haf
lineo/lgaj
llegaba/aS
loba/a
luchen/pa
lugar/a
lustrar /ha
macheteo/a
maestra/a
man/apS
mane /ha
margan/a
marine/GaS
marre/SGga
mas /a
melado/hiSa
melgu /a
meng  /ah
merengada/aS
mig /ha
minorad/a
misto/fGa
mohece/aSi
mojon /a
moldar/pRaDE
monedad/a
montase/haui
moraga/aS
morosa/ga
mosque/a
mostr /nag
muelan/a
mulo/Ga
muren/a
naranjada/a
niegos/a
nublar/aRED
pagador/GaSo
pale /a
panden/ai
parata/aS
pareci ndonos/a
paro/agpn
partan/akgp
pas bamos/r
pasad/orGhp
pasamos/rpho
pas ndose/r
pasarais/rho
pasaran/rpho
pasar is/ohr
pasaren/rpho
pasare/rGShpo
pasar an/ohr
pasarme/rpo
pasaron/rpho
pasarte/rpo
pasasen/rpho
pasasteis/r
pasen/orph
pas /orph
paularse/a
pedrea/aS
peg /iha
pel /jilpa
pene/aSGh
percibi /a
person /a
peso/rSp
piado/aG
pimpollada/aSh
pintaba/prSh
pint is/rhp
pintando/rph
pintarais/hr
pintaran/rph
pintareis/hr
pint remos/r
pintar /rhp
pintar an/rh
pintarse/rph
pintase/phr
pintasteis/r
pintemos/rhp
pinto/phr
pip /ia
placables/a
planchad/ah
plantill /ia
plegar /ha
p cima/aS
poltrones/a
ponen/ukgptalonbr
ponerte/koprl
poni ndolo/rtSG
poni ndote/rk
porre /a
posa/hap
poyen/pa
premian/a
prendi ndome/a
presten/ai
prieto/aSG
propincua/aS
puerta/rSb
pujad/rip
pujan/rip
puje/GSpri
puj /irp
pulgarada/aS
punt /apih
purr /a
quejar /ha
quietad/ka
quistad/fai
rana/aS
reno/a
romos/a
ronda/rS
saetad/a
saet /a
salari /a
salen/pgr
sal a/rp
sali /rp
sal/rpS
saltaban/rp
saltad/rGpa
salt ndome/r
salt ndose/r
saltan/rap
saltar n/pr
saltareis/r
saltaremos/r
saltare/rSGp
saltar an/r
saltarme/r
saltarse/rp
salt semos/r
saltase/rp
salt is/pr
salte/rSGpa
sanad/psr
sanar/sRpDrE
san /rsp
sedad/a
segund /a
sembrad/pr
senderean/a
seo/gGSa
seri /ai
sibila/aS
siembra/pr
signe/gGSpaf
s s/a
solapa/a
solar/kRDgsarf
solead/aG
solo/aGk
sol /argsfk
sonante/Sfpa
sueldo/rS
sueno/paf
sumiros/fpa
tabalean/a
taca/ahp
talaya/Sa
ta ese/a
taracen/a
tardeci /a
tasqu /a
tenacea/a
tenderle/aS
tend /isnaf
tercero/rS
terraje/GSa
testa/ikfoag
tienda/sifa
tildo/a
toa/a
tonal/aKS
tosigar/iRDaE
trabaje/aGS
traernos/a
trafague/a
trai ndola/a
trancar/ERpaD
tray ndote/a
tronad/ipah
tropo/aG
turbonada/aS
utilizaci n/rS
vaho/ha
valoran/aht
vasallo/Ga
vengo/afongplrst
ventura/ahS
vert a/sSfprk
verti /pr
vest /hkirp
vezar/aRhDpE
viejo/iGpah
viene/lnrtspgafo
viento/rSGa
villanada/Sa
vine/noltirafgps
visten/ajihrkp
visti /pkrhi
vituallad/a
viven/rpahf
vivid/rphf
viv /pfrh
vivo/hraqGfp
vol /pr
vuelo/pr
yermar/aRDE
zarand /a
zurrones/ia
